Washington statutes.
RCW 15.155.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agricultural product" has the same meaning as the term "agricultural commodities" in RCW 15.66.010, and is broadly construed to include, but is not limited to, all agricultural products or commodities grown or raised on Washington lands or caught in Washington waters, or foods, including processed or manufactured foods, containing such agricultural products.

(2) "Department" means the Washington department of agriculture.

(3) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee.

(4) "Food" has the same meaning as the term "food" in RCW 15.130.110.

(5) "Program" means the location-based promotion program created in this chapter to promote local food and agricultural products and make them more visible to consumers.

[ 2023 c 276 s 2.]